apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="пас__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>охме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>охте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъл</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ейки</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ях</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яхме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яхте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ял</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ем</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ящ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>яща</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ящо</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ящи</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ене</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="пас"><i>пас</i><par n="пас__vblex"/></e>
